Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-425
Rules and regulations; powers of board; amendments; record.

The board of directors shall adopt and have recorded with the county clerk such rules and regulations as may be reasonable and proper for the work in hand, and such rules shall provide what officers the district shall have. The rules may be changed from time to time but all amendments shall be duly recorded with the county clerk.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 19, p. 482;

R.S.1913, § 1889;

C.S.1922, § 1837;

C.S.1929, § 31-525;

R.S.1943, § 31-425.